Utah statutes.
78B-15-809.   Effect of nonvalidated gestational agreement.

(1)  A gestational agreement, whether in a record or not, which is not validated by a tribunal is not enforceable.

(2)  If a birth results under a gestational agreement that is not judicially validated as provided in this part, the parent-child relationship is determined as provided in Part 2, Parent-child Relationship.

(3)  The individuals who are parties to a nonvalidated gestational agreement as intended parents may be held liable for support of the resulting child, even if the agreement is otherwise unenforceable.  The liability under this Subsection (3) includes assessing all expenses and fees as provided in Section 78B-15-622.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

